Washington statutes.
RCW 4.12.060

To what county venue may be changed—Limitation on number of changes.

If the motion for a change of the place of trial be allowed, the change shall be made to the county where the action ought to have been commenced, if it be for the cause mentioned in RCW 4.12.030(1), and in other cases to the most convenient county where the cause alleged does not exist. Neither party shall be entitled to more than one change of the place of trial, except for causes not in existence when the first change was allowed.

[Code 1881 s 52; 1877 p 12 s 53; 1869 p 14 s 53; RRS s 210.]